Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1054
Attachment in actions on claims not due; judgment; when rendered.

The plaintiff in such action shall not have judgment on his claim before it becomes due, and the proceedings on attachment may be conducted without delay.

R.S.1867, Code § 242, p. 433;

R.S.1913, § 7783;

C.S.1922, § 8727;

C.S.1929, § 20-1054;

R.S.1943, § 25-1054.

Attachment will not support creditor's bill to set aside fraudulent conveyance. Ainsworth v. Roubal, 74 Neb. 723, 105 N.W. 248 (1905).

Judgment cannot be entered before claim is due. Cox & Cornell v. Peoria Mfg. Co., 42 Neb. 660, 60 N.W. 933 (1894).

Purchase-money mortgage given to secure particular debt remains valid in equity regardless of form the debt may assume, if it can be traced. Troyer v. Mundy, 60 F.2d 818 (8th Cir. 1932).